Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.301

Department to protect younger children in confinement from older youth confined pursuant to 2018 c 162.

The department must take appropriate actions to protect younger children in confinement from older youth who may be confined pursuant to chapter 162, Laws of 2018, recognizing both the potential for positive mentorship and the potential risks relating to victimization and the exercise of negative influence. The court may exercise oversight if needed to accomplish the goals of this section.

[ 2018 c 162 s 8.]

NOTES:

Report to legislature—2019 c 322 ss 2-6; 2018 c 162: See RCW 13.04.800.